Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-712
Membership; conditions.

All persons in rural areas proposed to be served by a corporation shall be eligible to membership in a corporation. No person shall become, be or remain a member of a corporation unless such person shall use or agree to use electric energy furnished by the corporation. A corporation organized under sections 70-701 to 70-738 may become a member of another corporation, and may avail itself fully of the facilities and services thereof.

Laws 1937, c. 50, § 12, p. 207;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 70-812;

R.S.1943, § 70-712.